Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 24

General Provisions

28-24-101. Contracts affecting the devise of property.

A valid agreement made by a testator to convey property devised in a will previously made shall not revoke the previous devise, but the property shall pass by the will subject to the same remedies on the agreement against the devisee as might have been enforced against the decedent if he or she had survived.

However, a contract to make a will or devise, or not to revoke a will or devise, or to die intestate, if executed after June 17, 1981, can be established only by:

Provisions of a will stating material provisions of the contract;

An express reference in a will to a contract and extrinsic evidence proving the terms of the contract; or

A writing signed by the decedent evidencing the contract.

The execution of a reciprocal or mutual will does not create a presumption of a contract not to revoke the will.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Brantley and Effland, Inheritance, The Share of the Surviving Spouse, and Wills: Arkansas Law and the Uniform Probate Code Compared, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 361.

Legislative Survey, Decedents' Estates, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 591.

This section does not control a purported agreement to make a will made before 1981. Jones v. Abraham, 58 Ark. App. 17, 946 S.W.2d 711 (1997).

Section 23-32-1005 [23-32-207] does not preclude the establishment of a constructive trust when a contract not to revoke a will has been properly established and the money in a survivorship account has been transferred in violation of such a contract. Avance v. Richards, 331 Ark. 32, 959 S.W.2d 396 (1998).

In suit for specific performance of oral contract to leave property to plaintiff, plaintiff's remedy is not against estate, but against devisees of the property, and a court of equity is the proper forum for a suit for specific performance. Morton v. Yell, 239 Ark. 195, 388 S.W.2d 88 (1965).

A constructive trust may be imposed despite the statute of frauds, because implied trusts, such as constructive trusts or resulting trusts, are specifically exempted from its application. Cole v. Rivers, 43 Ark. App. 123, 861 S.W.2d 551 (1993).

Wife had the power to amend her will and trust after the husband's death as the parties had not intended for the trust to be irrevocable, thereby negating the argument that reciprocal wills were created.Cason v. Lambert, 2015 Ark. App. 41, 454 S.W.3d 250 (2015).

Contract to make a will not shown where the 1976 wills permitted discretionary disposition of personal property, did not contain words like “agreement to make mutual wills” or “agreeing that the survivor leaves his property to the heirs listed,” and the other evidence presented was not clear, cogent, and convincing of the existence of such a contract. Avance v. Richards, 331 Ark. 32, 959 S.W.2d 396 (1998).

The chancellor's decision that there was no valid contract to make the appellant a beneficiary of the decedent's will was not clearly erroneous, notwithstanding testimony that after the decedent made the appellant the beneficiary of his will in October 1996, she agreed to keep house for him, cook his meals and take care of him, since neither that 1996 will nor the 1997 will at issue contained a statement of the material provisions of a contract between the decedent and the appellant and neither will contained an express reference to a contract between them. Hodges v. Cannon, 68 Ark. App. 170, 5 S.W.3d 89 (1999).

Circuit court did not clearly err in finding that there was no contractual agreement between a husband and wife to make their trusts irrevocable where there was no writing to that effect, both husband and wife reserved the right to amend, modify, or revoke the trusts in whole or in part at any time, and the only evidence supporting the contention that the husband executed an irrevocable trust came from witnesses related to the wife.Holmes v. Potter, 2017 Ark. App. 378, 523 S.W.3d 397 (2017).

The grant of a summary judgment against heirs was proper where settlement agreement was a valid, enforceable contract which the decedent's guardian had the authority to enter into on her behalf. Hardie v. Estate of Davis, 312 Ark. 189, 848 S.W.2d 417 (1993).

Cited: Morris v. Cullipher, 299 Ark. 204, 772 S.W.2d 313 (1989); Mabry v. McAfee, 301 Ark. 268, 783 S.W.2d 356 (1990).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 28; 1981, No. 658, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-412.

28-24-102. Sale of property devised by ward not an ademption.

In case of a guardian's sale or other transfer of any real or personal property specifically devised by a ward who was competent to make the will, but was incompetent at the time of the sale or transfer and never became competent thereafter, so that the devised property is not contained in the estate at the time of the ward's death, the devisee may, at his or her option, take the value of the property at the time of the ward's death with the incidents of a general devise or take the proceeds thereof with the incidents of a specific devise.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 30; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-414.